District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

33-526

Parties to action.

Repealed.

Sept. 28, 1962, 76 Stat. 661, Pub. L. 87-716, § 26
Dec. 10, 1987, D.C. Law 7-49, § 1105, 34 DCR 6856

History

1981 Ed., § 41-226.
1973 Ed., § 41-426.

Prior Codifications